Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska12-1117
Licenses; surrender; effect; reinstatement.

(1) Any licensee may surrender any license issued by the director by delivering the license to the director with written notice of its surrender. Surrender shall not change the licensee's civil or criminal liability for acts committed prior or subsequent to the surrender of such license. Voluntary surrender shall not constitute an admission against interest or an admission of liability nor shall the same be used in any evidentiary proceeding as such an admission.

(2) The director may reinstate a license or issue a new license to a person whose license has expired, has been revoked, or was voluntarily surrendered if no fact or condition exists which would cause a revocation or would have caused the director to originally refuse to issue such license.

Laws 1986, LB 643, § 17.